Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-118.01
Junk vehicle, defined.

Junk vehicle means a vehicle that:

(1) Is incapable of operating on any highway as defined in section 39-101; and

(2) Has no value except as scrap or a source of parts.

Laws 2025, LB97, § 9.